New York, session 2025-2026, A4120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 296 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 2-b to read as follows: 3 2-b. (a) Prohibited minimum income requirements for housing subsidy or 4 voucher recipients. For purposes of subdivisions two-a and five of this 5 section, it shall constitute unlawful discrimination because of lawful 6 source of income to commit any practice prohibited by such subdivisions 7 based upon the amount of a person's income where such person uses or 8 will use a housing subsidy or voucher that is provided by a public or 9 non-profit entity that issues rental payment, whether partial or full, 10 made directly to the housing provider, including but not limited to a 11 voucher under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 12 U.S.C. § 1437f), and the monthly rent is within the rental payment 13 limits allowable by such housing subsidy or voucher provider under 14 program rules or regulations. 15 (b) Prohibited minimum income requirements for public assistance 16 recipients. For purposes of subdivisions two-a and five of this 17 section, it shall constitute unlawful discrimination because of lawful 18 source of income to commit any practice prohibited by such subdivisions 19 based upon the amount of a person's income where such person uses or 20 will use housing assistance or public assistance that is provided by a 21 public or non-profit entity that issues rental payment, whether partial 22 or full, made directly to the housing provider and the individual's 23 portion of the monthly rent would be one-third or less of such individ- 24 ual's monthly gross income. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03462-01-5 A. 4120 2 1 (c) "Housing provider" defined. For the purposes of this subdivision, 2 the term "housing provider" shall mean the owner, lessee, sub-lessee, 3 assignee, or managing agent of housing accommodations, or other person 4 having the right to sell, rent or lease a housing accommodation, a real 5 estate broker, a real estate salesperson, or any agent or employee ther- 6 eof. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.